Utah statutes.
16-10a-842.   Liability of directors for unlawful distributions.
(1)  A director who votes for or assents to a distribution made in violation
of Section 16-10a-640 or the articles of incorporation is personally liable to
the corporation for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could
have been distributed without violating Section 16-10a-640 or the articles of
incorporation, if it is established that the director's duties were not
performed in compliance with Section 16-10a-840.  In any proceeding commenced
under this section, a director has all of the defenses ordinarily available to
a director.
(2)  A director held liable under Subsection (1) for an unlawful distribution
is entitled to contribution:
(a)  from every other director who could be held liable under Subsection (1)
for the unlawful distribution; and
(b)  from each shareholder, who accepted the distribution knowing the
distribution was made in violation of Section 16-10a-640 or the articles of
incorporation, the amount of the contribution from each shareholder being the
amount of the distribution to the shareholder multiplied by the percentage of
the amount of distribution to all shareholders that exceeded what could have
been distributed to shareholders without violating Section 16-10a-640 or the
articles of incorporation.
(3)  A proceeding under this section is barred unless it is commenced within
two years after the date on which the effect of the distribution is measured
under Subsection 16-10a-640(5) or (7).
